Utah statutes.
63G-6a-803.   Emergency procurement.

(1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a procurement officer or the procurement officer's designee may authorize an emergency procurement without using a standard procurement process when an emergency condition exists.

(2)  A procurement officer who authorizes an emergency procurement under Subsection (1) shall:

(a)  make the authorization in writing, stating the emergency condition upon which the emergency procurement is made; and

(b)  ensure that the procurement is made with as much competition as reasonably practicable while avoiding harm, or a risk of harm, to the public health, safety, welfare, or property.



Enacted by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session

